test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k34_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    drongur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: drongur
    drongur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: drong
    drongur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: [dreingi, drongi]
    drongur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: [dreingjar, drongs]
    drongur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: dreingir
    drongur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: dreingir
    drongur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: dreingjum
    drongur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: dreingja
    drongur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: drongurin
    drongur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: [dreingin, drongin]
    drongur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [dreinginum, dronginum]
    drongur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: [dreingjarins, drongsins]
    drongur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: dreingirnir
    drongur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: dreingirnar
    drongur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: dreingjunum
    drongur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: dreingjanna
